Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 3. Bond Anticipation Notes.

Sec. 37.15.300.
Borrowing in anticipation of sale of bonds permitted.

When the state bond committee considers it in the best interests of the state, it may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of general obligation and revenue bonds if money to be derived from the sale of the bonds has been appropriated by the legislature and

in the case of revenue bonds, the bonds to be sold have been authorized by law; or

in the case of general obligation bonds, the bonds to be sold have been

authorized by law and ratified by a majority vote of the qualified voters of the state who vote on the question; or

authorized by law for the purpose of meeting natural disasters, repelling invasion, suppressing insurrection, or defending the state in war.

History.

(§ 1 ch 42 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1964; am § 43 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Sec. 37.15.310.
Issuance of notes.

The state bond committee shall issue notes for the amounts borrowed with a maturity date not to exceed one year from the date of issue.
All the notes are payable at a fixed place, on or before a fixed time, or at a fixed time, from the proceeds of the sale of bonds, in anticipation of which the original note or notes were issued, unless the bonds have not been sold by the maturity date of the notes.
Interest on the notes is payable at a fixed place, on or before a fixed time, out of appropriations made for the payment of interest on general obligation notes or bonds of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 42 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1976)

Sec. 37.15.320.
Issuance of new notes.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 41 SLA 1967.]

Sec. 37.15.330.
Repayment of notes.

Every note shall be payable from the proceeds of the next succeeding sale of bonds or from the proceeds of the sale of new bond anticipation notes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 42 SLA 1964)

Sec. 37.15.340.
Security for repayment of general obligation bonds.

Notes issued in anticipation of the sale of general obligation bonds and the interest thereon are secured by the full faith, credit, and resources of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 42 SLA 1964)

Sec. 37.15.350.
Security for repayment of revenue bonds.

Notes issued in anticipation of the sale of revenue bonds and the interest thereon are secured in the same manner as are the revenue bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued.

History.

(§ 1 ch 42 SLA 1964)

Sec. 37.15.360.
Limitation on issuance of notes.

The total amount of such notes issued and outstanding shall at no time exceed the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued.

History.

(§ 1 ch 42 SLA 1964)

Sec. 37.15.370.
Use of proceeds from sale of notes.

The proceeds from the sale of the notes shall be used only for the purposes for which the proceeds from the sale of bonds may be used or to meet payment of outstanding bond anticipation notes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 42 SLA 1964)

Sec. 37.15.380.
Sale of notes.

Notes issued under this chapter shall be sold by the state bond committee in the manner and at the price or prices as it shall determine, at either public or private sale; however, a note sold under this chapter may not be sold for less than par and accrued interest or at an interest rate exceeding 11 percent a year or that rate of interest that is 110 percent of the rate of Bond Buyer Index of 20 Municipal Bond Average Yields for the week previous to the date of sale of the notes, whichever is higher.

History.

(§ 1 ch 42 SLA 1964; am § 3 ch 92 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 85 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 110 SLA 1982)

Sec. 37.15.390.
Execution of notes.

Notes for money borrowed in anticipation of receipts from the sale of bonds shall be signed by the governor and countersigned by the lieutenant governor. The governor’s and lieutenant governor’s signatures may be facsimile signatures.

History.

(§ 1 ch 42 SLA 1964; am § 4 ch 110 SLA 1982)